Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-106.01
Certain additions with low population density; included within corporate limits of city; when.

Commencing on April 17, 1982, an addition which has been approved pursuant to section 15-106 and is adjoining or contiguous to the corporate boundaries of a city of the primary class but which includes land which lies wholly or partially (1) outside of the area designated and described as being for future urban uses in the comprehensive plan adopted by the city pursuant to sections 15-1102 and 15-1103 and (2) within a zoning district adopted pursuant to section 15-902 which allows a residential density of not more than one dwelling per acre shall be included within the corporate limits of the city only upon the enactment of a city ordinance specifically annexing such addition.

Laws 1982, LB 909, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 39, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 10.